Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.06, subdivision 2c, is amended to read: Subd. 2c. Schedules of rates for individuals, estates, and trusts. (a) The income taxes imposed by this chapter upon married individuals filing joint returns and surviving spouses as defined in section 2(a) of the Internal Revenue Code must be computed by applying to their taxable net income the following schedule of rates: (1) On the first deleted text begin $38,770deleted text end new text begin $47,620new text end , deleted text begin 5.35deleted text end new text begin 4.35new text end percent; (2) On all over deleted text begin $38,770deleted text end new text begin $47,620new text end , but not over deleted text begin $154,020deleted text end new text begin $189,180new text end , deleted text begin 6.8deleted text end new text begin 5.8new text end percent; (3) On all over deleted text begin $154,020deleted text end new text begin $189,180new text end , but not over deleted text begin $269,010deleted text end new text begin $330,410new text end , deleted text begin 7.85deleted text end new text begin 6.85new text end percent; (4) On all over deleted text begin $269,010deleted text end new text begin $330,410new text end , deleted text begin 9.85deleted text end new text begin 8.85new text end percent. Married individuals filing separate returns, estates, and trusts must compute their income tax by applying the above rates to their taxable income, except that the income brackets will be one-half of the above amounts after the adjustment required in subdivision 2d. (b) The income taxes imposed by this chapter upon unmarried individuals must be computed by applying to taxable net income the following schedule of rates: (1) On the first deleted text begin $26,520deleted text end new text begin $32,570new text end , deleted text begin 5.35deleted text end new text begin 4.35new text end percent; (2) On all over deleted text begin $26,520deleted text end new text begin $32,570new text end , but not over deleted text begin $87,110deleted text end new text begin $106,990new text end , deleted text begin 6.8deleted text end new text begin 5.8new text end percent; (3) On all over deleted text begin $87,110deleted text end new text begin $106,990new text end , but not over deleted text begin $161,720deleted text end new text begin $198,630new text end , deleted text begin 7.85deleted text end new text begin 6.85new text end percent; (4) On all over deleted text begin $161,720deleted text end new text begin $198,630new text end , deleted text begin 9.85deleted text end new text begin 8.85new text end percent. (c) The income taxes imposed by this chapter upon unmarried individuals qualifying as a head of household as defined in section 2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code must be computed by applying to taxable net income the following schedule of rates: (1) On the first deleted text begin $32,650deleted text end new text begin $40,100new text end , deleted text begin 5.35deleted text end new text begin 4.35new text end percent; (2) On all over deleted text begin $32,650deleted text end new text begin $40,100new text end , but not over deleted text begin $131,190deleted text end new text begin $161,130new text end , deleted text begin 6.8deleted text end new text begin 5.8new text end percent; (3) On all over deleted text begin $131,190deleted text end new text begin $161,130new text end , but not over deleted text begin $214,980deleted text end new text begin $264,050new text end , deleted text begin 7.85deleted text end new text begin 6.85new text end percent; (4) On all over deleted text begin $214,980deleted text end new text begin $264,050new text end , deleted text begin 9.85deleted text end new text begin 8.85new text end percent. (d) In lieu of a tax computed according to the rates set forth in this subdivision, the tax of any individual taxpayer whose taxable net income for the taxable year is less than an amount determined by the commissioner must be computed in accordance with tables prepared and issued by the commissioner of revenue based on income brackets of not more than $100. The amount of tax for each bracket shall be computed at the rates set forth in this subdivision, provided that the commissioner may disregard a fractional part of a dollar unless it amounts to 50 cents or more, in which case it may be increased to $1. (e) An individual who is not a Minnesota resident for the entire year must compute the individual's Minnesota income tax as provided in this subdivision. After the application of the nonrefundable credits provided in this chapter, the tax liability must then be multiplied by a fraction in which: (1) the numerator is the individual's Minnesota source federal adjusted gross income as defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code and increased by: (i) the additions required under sections 290.0131, subdivisions 2, 6, 8 to 10, 16, 17, 19, and 20, and 290.0137, paragraph (a); and reduced by (ii) the Minnesota assignable portion of the subtraction for United States government interest under section 290.0132, subdivision 2, the subtractions under sections 290.0132, subdivisions 9, 10, 14, 15, 17, 18, 27, 31, and 32, and 290.0137, paragraph (c), after applying the allocation and assignability provisions of section 290.081, clause (a), or 290.17; and (2) the denominator is the individual's federal adjusted gross income as defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, increased by: (i) the additions required under sections 290.0131, subdivisions 2, 6, 8 to 10, 16, 17, 19, and 20, and 290.0137, paragraph (a); and reduced by (ii) the subtractions under sections 290.0132, subdivisions 2, 9, 10, 14, 15, 17, 18, 27, 31, and 32, and 290.0137, paragraph (c). (f) If an individual who is not a Minnesota resident for the entire year is a qualifying owner of a qualifying entity that elects to pay tax as provided in section 289A.08, subdivision 7a, paragraph (b), the individual must compute the individual's Minnesota income tax as provided in paragraph (e), and also must include, to the extent attributed to the electing qualifying entity: (1) in paragraph (e), clause (1), item (i), and paragraph (e), clause (2), item (i), the addition under section 290.0131, subdivision 5; and (2) in paragraph (e), clause (1), item (ii), and paragraph (e), clause (2), item (ii), the subtraction under section 290.0132, subdivision 3. new text begin (g) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2026, the rates in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) are adjusted as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the 4.35 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (1); (b), clause (1); and (c), clause (1), must equal 4.85 percent; new text end new text begin (2) the 5.8 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (2); (b), clause (2); and (c), clause (2), must equal 6.3 percent; new text end new text begin (3) the 6.85 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (3); (b), clause (3); and (c), clause (3), must equal 7.35 percent; and new text end new text begin (4) the 8.85 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (4); (b), clause (4); and (c), clause (4), must equal 9.35 percent. new text end new text begin (h) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2027, the rates in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) are adjusted as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the 4.35 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (1); (b), clause (1); and (c), clause (1), must equal 4.6 percent; new text end new text begin (2) the 5.8 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (2); (b), clause (2); and (c), clause (2), must equal 6.05 percent; new text end new text begin (3) the 6.85 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (3); (b), clause (3); and (c), clause (3), must equal 7.10 percent; and new text end new text begin (4) the 8.85 percent rate in paragraphs (a), clause (4); (b), clause (4); and (c), clause (4), must equal 9.10 percent. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.06, subdivision 2d, is amended to read: Subd. 2d. Inflation adjustment of brackets. The commissioner shall annually adjust the minimum and maximum dollar amounts for each rate bracket for which a tax is imposed in subdivision 2c as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year deleted text begin 2019deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . The rate applicable to any rate bracket must not be changed. The dollar amounts setting forth the tax shall be adjusted to reflect the changes in the rate brackets. The rate brackets as adjusted must be rounded to the nearest $10 amount. If the rate bracket ends in $5, it must be rounded up to the nearest $10 amount. The commissioner shall determine the rate bracket for married filing separate returns after this adjustment is done. The rate bracket for married filing separate must be one-half of the rate bracket for married filing joint. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end